Georgia, session 2025_26, HB929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2A of Title 31 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
Department of Public Health generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as
follows:
"31-2A-21.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Dietetics' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 43-11A-3.
H. B. 929
- 1 -

LC 60 0156
(2) 'Dietitian' means an individual duly licensed under Chapter 11A of Title 43 to
practice dietetics and who has at least one year of experience practicing dietetics.
(3) 'Eligible recipient' means a student of a public elementary or secondary school or a
patient at a federally qualified health center.
(4) 'Federally qualified health center' means a facility as defined in 42 U.S.C.
Section 1395x(aa)(4), as of July 1, 2025.
(b) Subject to available funding, the department, in collaboration with the Department of
Education, shall develop, implement, and conduct a three-year pilot program to provide
dietetics services to eligible recipients at public elementary and secondary schools and
federally qualified health centers beginning on June 30, 2026. Such pilot program shall
provide reimbursement for up to five dietitian visits for each eligible recipient, at a
reimbursement rate of up to $200.00 per visit.
(c) No later than June 30, 2027, and annually thereafter, the department shall submit a
detailed written report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the effectiveness of
the pilot program. The final report shall additionally include recommendations as to the
expansion or permanency of the pilot program and any proposed changes to the pilot
program relative to such recommendations.
(d) The department is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as may be necessary
to carry out and implement the provisions of this Code section.
(e) The pilot program created by this Code section shall terminate on June 30, 2029, and
this Code section shall be repealed by operation of law on such date."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 929
- 2 -